Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-112
Endorsement of original papers.

Upon filing original papers in any case, it shall be the duty of an attorney to endorse thereon his name.

R.S.1866, c. 3, § 13, p. 16;

R.S.1913, § 276;

C.S.1922, § 271;

C.S.1929, § 7-112;

R.S.1943, § 7-112.